Utah statutes.
20A-9-403.   Regular primary elections.
(1) (a)  The fourth Tuesday of June of each even-numbered year is designated
as regular primary election day.
(b)  Each registered political party that chooses to use the primary election
process to nominate some or all of its candidates shall comply with the
requirements of this section.
(2) (a)  As a condition for using the state's election system, each registered
political party that wishes to participate in the primary election shall:
(i)  declare their intent to participate in the primary election;
(ii)  identify one or more registered political parties whose members may vote
for the registered political party's candidates and whether or not persons
identified as unaffiliated with a political party may vote for the registered
political party's candidates; and
(iii)  certify that information to the lieutenant governor no later than 5
p.m. on March 1 of each even-numbered year.
(b)  As a condition for using the state's election system, each registered
political party that wishes to participate in the primary election shall:
(i)  certify the name and office of all of the registered political party's
candidates to the lieutenant governor no later than 5 p.m. on May 13 of each
even-numbered year; and
(ii)  certify the name and office of each of its county candidates to the
county clerks by 5 p.m. on May 13 of each even-numbered year.
(c)  By 5 p.m. on May 16 of each even-numbered year, the lieutenant governor
shall send the county clerks a certified list of the names of all statewide or
multicounty candidates that must be printed on the primary ballot.
(d) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(d)(ii), if a registered
political party does not wish to participate in the primary election, it shall
submit the names of its county candidates to the county clerks and the names
of all of its candidates to the lieutenant governor by 5 p.m. on May 30 of
each even-numbered year.
(ii)  A registered political party's candidates for President and Vice-
President of the United States shall be certified to the lieutenant governor
as provided in Subsection 20A-9-202(4).
(e)  Each political party shall certify the names of its presidential and
vice-presidential candidates and presidential electors to the lieutenant
governor's office no later than September 8 of each presidential election
year.
(3)  The county clerk shall:
(a)  review the declarations of candidacy filed by candidates for local boards
of education to determine if more than two candidates have filed for the same
seat;
(b)  place the names of all candidates who have filed a declaration of
candidacy for a local board of education seat on the nonpartisan section of
the ballot if more than two candidates have filed for the same seat; and
(c)  conduct a lottery to determine the order of the candidates' names on the
ballot.
(4)  After the county clerk receives the certified list from a registered
political party, the county clerk shall post or publish a primary election
notice in substantially the following form:
"Notice is given that a primary election will be held Tuesday, June ____,
________(year), to nominate party candidates for the parties and nonpartisan
offices listed on the primary ballot.  The polling place for voting precinct
____ is ____.  The polls will open at 7 a.m. and continue open until 8 p.m. of
the same day.  Attest: county clerk".
(5) (a)  Candidates receiving the highest number of votes cast for each office
at the regular primary election are nominated by their party or nonpartisan
group for that office.
(b)  If two or more candidates are to be elected to the office at the regular
general election, those party candidates equal in number to positions to be
filled who receive the highest number of votes at the regular primary election
are the nominees of their party for those positions.
(6) (a)  When a tie vote occurs in any primary election for any national,
state, or other office that represents more than one county, the governor,
lieutenant governor, and attorney general shall, at a public meeting called by
the governor and in the presence of the candidates involved, select the
nominee by lot cast in whatever manner the governor determines.
(b)  When a tie vote occurs in any primary election for any county office, the
district court judges of the district in which the county is located shall, at
a public meeting called by the judges and in the presence of the candidates
involved, select the nominee by lot cast in whatever manner the judges
determine.
(7)  The expense of providing all ballots, blanks, or other supplies to be
used at any primary election provided for by this section, and all expenses
necessarily incurred in the preparation for or the conduct of that primary
election shall be paid out of the treasury of the county or state, in the same
manner as for the regular general elections.
